tr: Basketbol koruma pedi konumu: Panya; Taban; Kolon/I-profil; Braket; Direk; Çember; Evrensel; Diğer
zh-TW: 籃球防護墊地點: 籃板; 底座; 圓柱/工字樑; 角撐板; 柱子; 籃框; 通用; 其他
pt-BR: Local do acolchoamento da bola de basquete: Tabela; Base; Coluna/viga em I; Reforço; Poste; Aro; Universal; Outros
fr: Zone de protection du système de basket: Panneau; Base; Colonne/poutre en I; Gousset; Poteau; Arceau; Universel; Autre
de: Basketball-Polsterungsposition: Backboard; Standfuß; Säule/Doppel-T-Träger; Verstärkung; Mast; Korbring; Universell; Sonstige
ko: 농구 패드 위치: 백보드; 받침대; 기둥/I빔; 거싯; 폴; 림; 범용; 기타
da: Placering af polstring på basketball: Plade; Fod; Søjle/I-bjælke; Kile; Stang; Kurv; Universal; Andet
hr-HR: Lokacija podstave za košarku: Tabla; Postolje; Stup / I-profil; Potpornik; Šipka; Obruč; Univerzalno; Ostalo
zh-CN: 篮球护垫地点: 篮板; 底座; 立柱/工字钢; 角撑板; 立柱; 篮筐; 通用; 其他
sv: Utfyllnadsplats för basketbollar: Plank; Fot; Pelare/I-balk; Förstärkningskil; Stolpe; Ring; Universell; Övrigt
nb: Basketball utfyllingssted: Bakplate; Fot; Søyle/I-bjelke; Kile; Stang; Ring; Universell; Annet
cs: Umístění basketbalového polstrování: Deska; Základna; Sloup/I-profil; Výztuha; Tyč; Obruč; Univerzální; Jiné
fi: Koripallo reunatäytteen sijainti: Taustalevy; Jalusta; Pylväs/I-palkki; Vahvike; Tolppa; Korirengas; Yleiskäyttöinen; Muu
nl: Basketbal vulling locatie: Backboard; Voet; Zuil/I-profiel; Verstevigingsplaat; Paal; Ring; Universeel; Overig
sl-SI: Območje oblazinjenja za košarko: Tabla; Podstavek; Steber/I-profil; Ojačitev; Steber; Obroč; Univerzalno; Drugo
en: Basketball padding location: Backboard; Base; Column/I-beam; Gusset; Pole; Rim; Universal; Other
es: Ubicación de la almohadilla en el balón de baloncesto: Tablero; Base; Columna/viga en I; Refuerzo; Poste; Aro; Universal; Otro
sk-SK: Umiestnenie podložky na basketbalovom koši: Doska; Základňa; Stĺp/I-profil; Vystuženie; Tyč; Obrúčka; Univerzálne; Iné
el: Θέση της επένδυσης στη μπάλα μπάσκετ: Ταμπλό; Βάση; Κολόνα / I-beam; Ενίσχυση; Στύλος; Στεφάνη; Γενικής χρήσης; Άλλο
ru: Расположение баскетбольной накладки: Щит; Основание; Стойка / двутавровая балка; Усиливающая накладка; Опора; Кольцо; Универсальная; Другое
ro-RO: Locații căptușeală baschet: Panou; Bază; Coloană/grindă în I; Gușeu; Stâlp; Inel; Universal; Altele
lt-LT: Krepšinio apsaugų tvirtinimo vietos: Lenta; Pagrindas; Kolona / dvitėjinė sija; Atrama; Stovas; Lankas; Universalus; Kita
bg-BG: Място на омекотяване/падинг при баскетболна топка: Табло; Основа; Колона/двойно Т-образен профил; Ъглова планка; Стълб; Ринг; Универсално; Друго
hu: Kosárlabdamargó helyszíne: Palánk; Talp; Oszlop/I-gerenda; Merevítő; Rúd; Gyűrű; Univerzális; Egyéb
th: ตำแหน่งการติดตั้งแผ่นรองสำหรับบาสเกตบอล: แป้นบาส; ฐาน; เสา/คานเหล็ก; แผ่นรัดมุม; เสา; ห่วงแป้นบาส; อเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
vi: Vị trí đệm bóng rổ: Bảng rổ; Đế; Cột/Dầm chữ I; Miếng gia cường; Cột; Vành rổ; Đa năng; Khác
ja: バスケットボール余白位置: バックボード; ベース; 柱/I型鋼; ガセット; ポール; リム; 汎用; その他
it: Basket spaziatura interna sede: Tabellone; Base; Colonna/Trave a I; Tassello; Palo; Anello; Universale; Altro
pt-PT: Localização de proteção para basquetebol: Tabela; Base; Coluna/Viga em I; Reforço; Poste; Aro; Universal; Outro
pl: Miejsce montażu osłony koszykarskiej: Tablica; Podstawa; Kolumna/dwuteownik; Zastrzał; Słup; Obręcz; Uniwersalne; Inne